Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-527
Hunter orange display required; exception; violation; penalty.

(1) For purposes of this section, hunter orange means a daylight fluorescent orange color with a dominant wave length between five hundred ninety-five and six hundred five nanometers, an excitation purity of not less than eighty-five percent, and a luminance factor of not less than forty percent.

(2) Any person hunting deer, antelope, wild turkey, elk, or mountain sheep during an authorized firearm season in this state shall display on his or her head, chest, and back a total of not less than four hundred square inches of hunter orange material except as exempted by rules and regulations of the commission.

(3) Any person who violates this section shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

(4) This section shall not apply to archery hunters hunting during a non-center-fire firearm season or in a management unit where a current center-fire firearm season is not open. The commission may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations allowing additional exceptions and establishing requirements for the display of hunter orange during other authorized hunting seasons.

Laws 1972, LB 1216, § 1;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-215.05;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 247;

Laws 1999, LB 176, § 72;

Laws 2007, LB299, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB287, § 15.